Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1763
Collection of taxes; failure to make settlement with state; suit by Tax Commissioner.

Upon the failure of any county treasurer to make settlement with the Tax Commissioner, the Tax Commissioner shall sue the treasurer and his or her surety upon the bond of such treasurer, or sue the treasurer in such form as may be necessary, and take all such proceedings, either upon such bond or otherwise, as may be necessary to protect the interest of the state.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 187, p. 457;

R.S.1913, § 6515;

C.S.1922, § 6043;

C.S.1929, § 77-1948;

R.S.1943, § 77-1763;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 172;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 85.